Washington statutes.
RCW 10.122.120

Notice of intent to introduce unrecorded statement.

If the prosecution intends to introduce in its case in chief a statement made during a custodial interrogation to which RCW 10.122.030 applies which was not recorded electronically, the prosecution, not later than the time specified by the local rules governing discovery, shall serve the defendant with written notice of that intent and of any exception on which the prosecution intends to rely.

[ 2021 c 329 s 12.]